Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 53. Health Insurance Reform Commission.

§ 30-339.
Health Insurance Reform Commission established; membership; terms.

The Health Insurance Reform Commission (the Commission) is established in the legislative branch of state government.

The Commission shall consist of 10 members that include eight legislative members and two nonvoting ex officio members as follows: four members of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates in accordance with the principles of proportional representation contained in the Rules of the House of Delegates; four members of the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules; and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources and the Commissioner of Insurance, or their designees.

Members of the Commission shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments. All members may be reappointed.

The Commission annually shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from among its membership, who shall be members of the General Assembly.

History.

2013, c. 709.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee on Labor and Commerce” for “House Committee on Commerce and Labor.” March 10, 2021.

§ 30-340.
Quorum; meetings; voting on recommendations.

A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the chairman or whenever the majority of the members so request.

No recommendation of the Commission shall be adopted if a majority of the Senate members or a majority of the House members appointed to the Commission (i) vote against the recommendation and (ii) vote for the recommendation to fail notwithstanding the majority vote of the Commission.

History.

2013, c. 709.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

§ 30-341.
Compensation; expenses.

Legislative members of the Commission shall receive such compensation as provided in § 30-19.12. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. Funding for the compensation and costs of expenses of members shall be provided by the State Corporation Commission.

History.

2013, c. 709.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

§ 30-342.
Powers and duties.

The Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

Monitor the work of appropriate federal and state agencies in implementing the provisions of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (the Act), including amendments thereto and regulations promulgated thereunder;

Receive information provided to the Commission pursuant to § 30-343 and, on the basis of such information, assess the implications of the Act’s implementation on residents of the Commonwealth, businesses operating within the Commonwealth, and the general fund of the Commonwealth;

Consider the development of a comprehensive strategy for implementing health reform in Virginia, including recommendations for innovative health care solutions independent of the approach embodied in the Act that meet the needs of Virginia’s citizens and government by creating an improved health system that will serve as an economic driver for the Commonwealth while allowing for more effective and efficient delivery of high quality care at lower cost;

Receive periodic reports from the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission pursuant to § 30-343 and recommend health benefits required to be included within the scope of the essential health benefits provided under health insurance products offered in the Commonwealth, including any benefits that are not required to be provided by the terms of the Act;

Upon request of the Chairman of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor, assess proposed mandated benefits and providers as provided in § 30-343 and recommend whether, on the basis of such assessments, mandated benefits and providers be providers under health care plans offered through a health benefit exchange, outside a health benefit exchange, neither, or both;

Conduct other studies of mandated benefits and provider issues as requested by the General Assembly; and

Develop such recommendations as may be appropriate for legislative and administrative consideration in order to increase access to health insurance coverage, ensure that the costs to business and individual purchasers of health insurance coverage are reasonable, and encourage a robust market for health insurance products in the Commonwealth.

History.

2013, c. 709; 2015, c. 698.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee on Labor and Commerce or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “House or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor.” March 10, 2021.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 698 inserted “Receive information provided to the Commission pursuant to § 30-343 and, on the basis of such information” in subdivision 2; deleted “recommendations of the Virginia Health Reform Initiative to the Governor regarding the” following “Consider the” in subdivision 3; rewrote subdivisions 4 and 5; deleted subdivision 6 which read: “Provide assessments of existing and proposed mandated health insurance benefits and providers, including assessments of whether such a mandate (i) is included in the essential health benefits required by federal law to be provided under a health care plan and (ii) should be provided under health care plans offered through a health benefit exchange, outside a health benefit exchange, neither, or both”; made minor stylistic changes.

§ 30-343.
Standing committees to request Commission assessment.

Whenever a legislative measure containing a mandated health insurance benefit or provider is proposed that is not identical or substantially similar to a legislative measure previously reviewed by the Commission within the three-year period immediately preceding the then-current session of the General Assembly, the Chair of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor having jurisdiction over the proposal shall (i) request that the Commission assess the proposal and (ii) send a copy of such request to the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission (the Bureau). The Commission shall be given a period of 24 months to complete and submit its assessment. A report summarizing the Commission’s assessment shall be forwarded to the Chairman of the standing committee that requested the assessment. For the purposes of this section, “mandated health insurance benefit or provider” has the same meaning as “state-mandated health benefit” provided in §

38.2-3406.1

.

Upon receipt of a copy of such a request, the Bureau shall prepare an analysis of the extent to which the proposed mandate is currently available under qualified health plans in the Commonwealth and advise the Commission as to whether, on the basis of that analysis, the applicable agency has determined or would likely determine, in accordance with applicable federal rules, that the proposed mandate exceeds the scope of the essential health benefits. The Bureau’s analysis shall be advisory only and not binding upon the Commission, the Bureau, the State Corporation Commission, or any other parties. As used in this section, “applicable agency” means the governmental agency that in accordance with applicable federal rules is responsible for identifying state-mandated benefits that are in addition to the essential health benefits. If the applicable federal rules require an agency of the Commonwealth to identify the state-mandated benefits that are in addition to the essential health benefits but do not identify a specific agency that is responsible for making such identification, the Bureau shall be the applicable agency.

Upon request of the Commission, the Bureau and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall jointly assess the social and financial impact and the medical efficacy of the proposed mandate, which assessment shall include an estimate of the effects of enactment of the proposed mandate on the costs of health coverage in the Commonwealth, including any estimated additional costs that the Commonwealth may be responsible for pursuant to § 1311(d)(3)(B) of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act should the proposed mandate ultimately be determined by the applicable agency to be a benefit that exceeds the scope of the essential health benefits. Upon completion of the assessment by the Bureau and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission, the Commission may make a recommendation regarding its support of or opposition to the enactment of the proposed mandate. The Commission’s recommendation may address whether the proposed mandate should be provided under health care plans offered through a health benefit exchange or outside a health benefit exchange.The Commission shall be given a period of 24 months to complete and submit its assessment. A report summarizing the Commission’s study shall be forwarded to the Governor and the General Assembly.

Whenever a legislative measure containing a mandated health insurance benefit or provider is identical or substantially similar to a legislative measure previously reviewed by the Commission within the three-year period immediately preceding the then-current session of the General Assembly, the standing committee may request the Commission to study the measure as provided in subsection A.

History.

2013, c. 709; 2015, c. 698; 2016, c. 570; 2017, c. 485; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 259.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, cc. 332 and 333, cl. 2 provides: “That the requirements of § 30-343 of the Code of Virginia regarding the conduct of an assessment by the Health Insurance Reform Commission shall not apply to this act.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 487 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“1. Notwithstanding §

38.2-3418.18

, as enacted during the 2020 Regular Session of the General Assembly, coverage of hearing aids for children shall not become effective until the Health Insurance Reform Commission, established pursuant to Chapter 53 (§ 30-339 et seq.) of Title 30 of the Code of Virginia, has completed an assessment of such coverage in accordance with the requirements of § 30-343 of the Code of Virginia, including a joint assessment by the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission of the social and financial impact of the proposed mandate in accordance with § 30-343 of the Code of Virginia and the impact of the proposed mandate on health care providers, access to health care services, and the cost of health care in the Commonwealth and any process changes required to implement the mandated benefit. In addition, the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission and the Bureau of Insurance shall jointly examine whether changes could be made to the Essential Health Benefits Benchmark Plan to include hearing aids for minors as an essential health benefit without cost to the Commonwealth.

“2. The Health Insurance Reform Commission, the Bureau of Insurance, and the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission shall report their findings to the Chairs of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance and Appropriations Committees by November 1, 2020.

“3. If the findings determine that no fiscal impact shall be incurred by the Commonwealth, such coverage may commence on July 1, 2021.”

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “House Committee on Labor and Commerce or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor” for “House or Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor.” March 10, 2021.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 698 rewrote subsection A; added subsections B and C;
and redesignated former subsection B as subsection D.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 570, in subsection B, substituted “applicable agency has determined or” for “Exchange” in the first sentence, deleted “the Exchange” preceding “the Bureau” in the second sentence and added the last two sentences; in subsection C, substituted “applicable agency” for “Exchange”; and in subsection D, substituted “then-current” for “then current”; and inserted “the measure.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 485, in the first sentence of subsection A, inserted the clause (i) designation, added clause (ii), and made a related change; and in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “a copy of” and substituted “shall” for “the Commission shall request the Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission (the Bureau) to.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 259, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “Chair of the House Committee on Labor and Commerce” for “Chairman of the House” and added the last sentence.

§ 30-344.
Staffing.

Administrative staff support for the Commission shall be provided by the Office of the Clerk of the Senate or the Office of Clerk of the House of Delegates as may be appropriate for the house in which the chairman of the Commission serves. The Division of Legislative Services shall provide legal, research, policy analysis, and other services as requested by the Commission. The Bureau of Insurance of the State Corporation Commission and such other state agencies as may be considered appropriate by the Commission shall provide staff assistance to the Commission All agencies of the Commonwealth shall provide assistance to the Commission, upon request.

History.

2013, c. 709; 2015, c. 698.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 698 added the second sentence, and deleted “the Joint Legislative Audit and Review Commission” preceding “and such,” in the third sentence.

§ 30-345.
Chairman’s executive summary of activity and work of the Commission.

The chairman of the Commission shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly an annual executive summary of the interim activity and work of the Commission no later than the first day of each regular session of the General Assembly. The executive summary shall be submitted as provided in the procedures of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems for the processing of legislative documents and reports and shall be posted on the General Assembly’s website.

History.

2013, c. 709.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2 repealed former § 30-346, which had contained a sunset provision for this chapter. This section will not expire July 1, 2017.

§ 30-346.
Repealed by Acts 2017, c. 485, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 30-346, providing a July 1, 2017 sunset provision for this chapter, was derived from Acts 2013, c. 709.